Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5116SV (2) 91 je/ns S.F. 2302 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 261M.1 Definition. 1 As used in this chapter, âinstitution of higher educationâ 2 means an institution of higher learning governed by the state 3 board of regents. âInstitution of higher educationâ also 4 includes an accredited private institution as defined in 5 section 256.183 with respect to students who are awarded a 6 tuition grant as defined in section 256.183. 7 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 261M.2 Career development meeting for 8 newly enrolled students. 9 1. An institution of higher education shall schedule 10 each enrolled undergraduate student for a meeting with the 11 institutionâs career development office or similar unit of 12 the institution. The institution may schedule the meeting in 13 the studentâs first year of enrollment, during new student 14 orientation, or between acceptance of the studentâs application 15 and new student orientation. The meeting must include but is 16 not limited to all of the following: 17 a. A review of the studentâs work history, if applicable. 18 b. A review of the studentâs areas of interest. 19 c. If the student has not declared a major, a review of 20 possible career paths based on the studentâs areas of interest. 21 d. If the student has declared a major, a review of possible 22 career paths based on the studentâs current major. 23 e. A review of relevant internship, volunteer, and 24 employment opportunities related to the studentâs areas 25 of interest or major as well as relevant graduate-level 26 educational opportunities. 27 f. A review of available resources regarding building and 28 updating a resume, seeking professional recommendations for 29 employment, drafting cover letters, and submitting writing 30 samples. 31 2. The office or unit shall encourage the student to 32 continue to utilize the resources of the office or unit 33 following the meeting. 34 3. An institution is not required to schedule a meeting 35 -1- LSB 5116SV (2) 91 je/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 2302 under this section for a student who attended such a meeting at 1 another institution of higher education. 2 4. An institution may hold a meeting required under this 3 section in person or by electronic means. 4 5. If a student fails to attend a meeting scheduled under 5 this section, the institution shall contact the student via 6 both telephone and electronic mail to inform the student of 7 their failure to attend and to attempt to reschedule the 8 meeting. Once the institution has attempted to reschedule the 9 meeting five times each by telephone and electronic mail, the 10 institution may cease attempting to reschedule the meeting. 11 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 261M.3 Materials. 12 Before or during a meeting scheduled under section 261M.2, 13 the institutionâs career development office or similar unit 14 of the institution shall provide the student with all of the 15 following information in an electronic or paper format: 16 1. Information on how to connect with persons working in 17 fields of study or industries of interest to the student or 18 related to the studentâs declared major. 19 2. Information regarding the number of related jobs that 20 were available in fields of study or industries of interest to 21 the student or related to the studentâs declared major for the 22 prior year as well as the prior five years. 23 3. Information regarding average compensation and the pay 24 range of jobs identified in subsection 2. 25 4. Information that identifies the highest paying 26 occupations or careers in Iowa during the prior year as well 27 as the prior five years. 28 5. Information that identifies the highest demand 29 occupations or careers in Iowa during the prior year as well 30 as the prior five years. 31 6. Information that identifies the highest paying 32 occupations or careers in Iowa during the prior year as well as 33 the prior five years that were also in the highest demand. 34 7. Information that identifies the highest demand 35 -2- LSB 5116SV (2) 91 je/ns 2/ 3 S.F. 2302 occupations or careers in Iowa that had the highest 1 compensation and that do not require a bachelorâs degree during 2 the prior year as well as the prior five years. 3 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to undergraduate 4 students enrolling in an institution of higher education, as 5 defined in section 261M.1, as enacted by this Act, for the 6 first time on or after the effective date of this Act. 7